Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,141
Dissolved corporation; trustees; inventory.

As soon as practicable after their appointment, the trustees shall make and file in the office of the clerk of the court, an inventory of all the effects, rights and credits which come to their possession or knowledge, the truth of which inventory shall be sworn to.

R.S.1867, Code § 724, p. 519;

R.S.1913, § 8348;

C.S.1922, § 9300;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,132;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,141.